Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Article 9. Comprehensive Community Corrections Act for Local-Responsible Offenders.

§ 9.1-173.
Purpose.

It is the purpose of this article to enable any city, county or combination thereof to develop, establish, and maintain a local community-based probation services agency to provide the judicial system with sentencing alternatives for certain misdemeanants or persons convicted of felonies that are not felony acts of violence, as defined in §

19.2-297.1

and sentenced pursuant to §

19.2-303.3

, for whom the court imposes a sentence of 12 months or less and who may require less than institutional custody.

The article shall be interpreted and construed so as to:

Allow individual cities, counties, or combinations thereof greater flexibility and involvement in responding to the problem of crime in their communities;

Provide more effective protection of society and to promote efficiency and economy in the delivery of correctional services;

Provide increased opportunities for offenders to make restitution to victims of crimes through financial reimbursement or community service;

Permit cities, counties or combinations thereof to operate and utilize local community-based probation services specifically designed to meet the rehabilitative needs of selected offenders; and

Provide appropriate post-sentencing alternatives in localities for certain offenders with the goal of reducing the incidence of repeat offenders.

History.

1980 c. 300, §

53.1-180

; 1982, c. 636; 1983, c. 344; 1990, c. 578; 1992, c. 196; 1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2; 1995, cc. 502, 574; 1996, c. 568; 2000, c. 1040; 2001, c. 844; 2002, c. 491; 2007, c. 133.

Cross references.

As to exclusions under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act pertaining to records of adult persons under investigation, probation supervision or monitoring by a local community-based probation services agency in accordance with this article, see §

2.2-3706

. As to monitoring of individuals with license restrictions or suspensions related to purchasing or possessing alcoholic beverages, see §

4.1-305

. As to the confidentiality of court records, see § 16.1-305. As to bodily injury to probation officer by probationer or parolee, see §

18.2-55

.

As to dissemination of juvenile record information, see §

19.2-389.1

.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 491, effective April 5, 2002, in the first paragraph, substituted “local community-based probation” for “community-based corrections” preceding “programs,” substituted “felonies that are not felony acts of violence” for “nonviolent felonies,” substituted “§

19.2-297.1

” for “§

19.2-316.1

,” and substituted “imposes a sentence of twelve months or less” for “may impose a jail sentence”; and inserted “local community-based probation” in subdivision 4.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 133, in the introductory paragraph, substituted “a local community-based probation services agency” for “local community-based probation programs” and made a minor stylistic change; and deleted “programs and” following “community-based probation” in subdivision 4.

§ 9.1-173.1.
Procedures for treatment of veterans and active service members.

Localities may establish special treatment procedures for veterans and active military service members pursuant to §

2.2-2001.1

.

History.

2011, cc. 772, 847.

§ 9.1-174.
Establishment of a community-based probation services agency.

To facilitate local involvement and flexibility in responding to the problem of crime in their communities and to permit a locally designed community-based probation services agency that will fit its needs, any city, county or combination thereof may, and any city, county or combination thereof that is required by §

53.1-82.1

to file a community-based corrections plan shall establish a system of community-based services pursuant to this article. This system is to provide alternatives for (i) offenders who are convicted and sentenced pursuant to §

19.2-303.3

and who are considered suitable candidates for probation services that require less than incarceration in a local correctional facility and (ii) defendants who are provided a deferred proceeding and placed on probation services. Such services may be provided by qualified public agencies or by qualified private agencies pursuant to appropriate contracts.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-128.17; 1980, c. 300; 1982, c. 636, § 53.1-181; 1983, c. 344; 1992, c. 196; 1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2; 1995, cc. 502, 574; 1999, c. 372; 2000, c. 1040; 2001, c. 844; 2006, c. 883; 2007, c. 133.

Cross references.

As to required blood, saliva, or tissue sample for DNA analysis upon conviction of certain crimes, see §

19.2-310.2

.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 883, in the first sentence, inserted “probation” and substituted “that” for “which” twice, in the second sentence, deleted “defendents and” preceding clause (i), added the clause (i) designation, in clause (i), inserted “are convicted or sentenced” and deleted “are convicted,
sentenced and placed on probation services through a court” following “§

19.2-303.3

,” added clause (ii), and inserted “by qualified” in the last sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 133 substituted “a locally designed community-based probation services agency” for “locally designed probation programs” in the first sentence, in the second sentence, substituted “alternatives” for “alternative programs” and “candidates for probation services” for “candidates for programs” and added “services” at the end and substituted “services” for “programs and services” in the last sentence.

§ 9.1-175.
Board to prescribe standards; biennial plan.

The Board shall approve standards as prescribed by the Department for the development, implementation, operation, and evaluation of local community-based probation services and facilities authorized by this article, which shall include standards for the transfer of supervision between local community-based probation agencies. Any city, county, or combination thereof which establishes and provides local community-based probation services pursuant to this article shall submit a biennial criminal justice plan to the Department for review and approval.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-128.18; 1980, c. 300; 1982, c. 636, § 53.1-182; 1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2; 1999, c. 372; 2000, c. 1040; 2001, c. 844; 2002, c. 491; 2007, c. 133; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 191.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 491, effective April 5, 2002, inserted “criminal justice” in the last sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 133 deleted “programs” following “community-based probation” in the first sentence and substituted “and provides local community-based probation services” for “programs and provides services” in the last sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 191, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “which shall include standards for the transfer of supervision between local community-based probation agencies” in the first sentence.

§ 9.1-176.
Mandated services; optional services and facilities.

As used in this section:“Detoxification center program” means any facility program or procedure for the placement of public inebriates as an alternative to arresting and jailing such persons, for the purpose of monitoring the withdrawal from excessive use of alcohol or use of a narcotic drug or other intoxicant or drug of whatever nature.“Public inebriate” means any person who is intoxicated in a public place and would be subject to arrest for public intoxication under §

18.2-388

or a local ordinance established for the same offense.

Any city, county or combination thereof that elects or is required to establish a local community-based probation services agency pursuant to this article shall provide to the judicial system the following services as components of local community-based probation supervision: community service; home incarceration with or without electronic monitoring; electronic monitoring; and substance abuse screening, assessment, testing and treatment. Additional services and facilities, including, but not limited to, local day reporting centers and services, local halfway house facilities and services for the temporary care of adults placed on community-based probation, and law-enforcement diversion into detoxification center programs may be established by the city, county or combination thereof.Any city, county, or combination thereof, may develop, establish, operate, maintain, or contract with any qualified public or private agency for local or regional detoxification center programs, services, or facilities.The chief judge of the general district court in the jurisdiction that will be served by the facility shall approve the facility for the diversion of public inebriates from arrest and jail pursuant to §

18.2-388

.

History.

1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2, § 53.1-182.1; 1996, c. 569; 1997, c. 339; 1999, c. 372; 2000, c. 1040; 2001, c. 844; 2002, c. 491; 2007, c. 133; 2011, cc. 821, 854.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 491, effective April 5, 2002, in the first sentence, substituted “that” for “which” preceding “elects,” substituted “local community-based probation” for “community-based correction,” inserted “as components of local probation supervision,” deleted “probation supervision” following “monitoring,” and inserted “screening”; in the second sentence, substituted “law-enforcement” for “public inebriate,” inserted “into detoxification center,” and inserted “as defined in §

9.1-163

.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 133, in the first sentence, substituted “community-based probation services agency” for “community-based probation program,” deleted “programs and” preceding “services as components” and inserted “community-based” preceding “probation supervision”; and in the last sentence, substituted “services and facilities” for “programs and services,” “reporting centers” for “reporting center programs” and “halfway house facilities” for “halfway house programs” and inserted “community-based” preceding “probation.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 821 and 854 are identical, and added subsection A; designated the existing provisions of the section as the first paragraph in subsection B, and therein deleted “as defined in §

9.1-163

” following “detoxification center programs”; and added the last two paragraphs in subsection B.

§ 9.1-176.1.
Duties and responsibilities of local community-based probation officers.

Each local community-based probation officer, for the localities served, shall:

Supervise and assist all local-responsible adult offenders, residing within the localities served and placed on local community-based probation by any judge of any court within the localities served;

Ensure offender compliance with all orders of the court, including the requirement to perform community service;

Conduct, when ordered by a court, substance abuse screenings, or conduct or facilitate the preparation of assessments pursuant to state approved protocols;

Conduct, at his discretion, random drug and alcohol tests on any offender whom the officer has reason to believe is engaged in the illegal use of controlled substances or marijuana or the abuse of alcohol or prescribed medication;

Facilitate placement of offenders in substance abuse education or treatment programs and services or other education or treatment programs and services based on the needs of the offender;

Seek a capias from any judicial officer in the event of failure to comply with conditions of local community-based probation or supervision on the part of any offender provided that noncompliance resulting from intractable behavior presents a risk of flight, or a risk to public safety or to the offender;

Seek a motion to show cause for offenders requiring a subsequent hearing before the court;

Provide information to assist any law-enforcement officer with the return to custody of defendants placed on supervision for which a capias has been sought;

Keep such records and make such reports as required by the Department of Criminal Justice Services;

Determine by reviewing the Department of Forensic Science DNA data bank sample tracking system upon intake and again prior to discharge whether a blood, saliva, or tissue sample is stored in the DNA data bank for each offender required to submit a sample pursuant to Article 1.1 (§

19.2-310.2

et seq.) of Chapter 18 of Title 19.2 and, if an offender’s sample is not stored in the data bank, require the offender to submit a sample for DNA analysis;

Monitor the collection and payment of restitution to the victims of crime for offenders placed on local supervised probation; and

Determine by reviewing the offender’s criminal history record at least 60 days prior to discharge whether all offenses for which the offender is being supervised appear on such record and, if any such offense that is required to be reported to the Central Criminal Records Exchange pursuant to §

19.2-390

does not appear, (i) order the offender to report to the law-enforcement agency that made the arrest for such offense or to the Department of State Police and submit to having his fingerprints and photograph taken for each such offense, (ii) provide written or electronic notification to the Central Criminal Records Exchange within the Department of State Police that the offense does not appear on the offender’s criminal history record, and (iii) verify that such fingerprints and photograph have been taken.

Each local probation officer may provide the following optional services, as appropriate and when available resources permit:

Supervise local-responsible adult offenders placed on home incarceration with or without home electronic monitoring as a condition of local community-based probation;

Investigate and report on any local-responsible adult offender and prepare or facilitate the preparation of any other screening, assessment, evaluation, testing or treatment required as a condition of probation;

Monitor placements of local-responsible adults who are required to perform court-ordered community service at approved work sites;

Assist the courts, when requested, by monitoring the collection of court costs and fines for offenders placed on local probation; and

Collect supervision and intervention fees pursuant to §

9.1-182

subject to local approval and the approval of the Department of Criminal Justice Services.

History.

2003, c. 142; 2007, cc. 133, 528; 2011, cc. 384, 410; 2014, cc. 674, 719; 2018, cc. 316, 671; 2019, cc. 782, 783; 2022, cc. 41, 42.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 782 and 783, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of State Police, in coordination with the Department of Criminal Justice Services, shall develop a form to be used by local community-based probation officers when ordering an offender to report to a law-enforcement agency or to the Department of State Police and submit to having his fingerprints and photograph taken pursuant to the provisions of subdivision A 12 of §

9.1-176.1

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act. Such form shall include information necessary for that law-enforcement agency or the Department of State Police to ensure that the fingerprints and photograph of the offender can be applied to his criminal history record for each offense that does not appear on the criminal history record. Such form shall include a portion that is returnable to the local community-based probation office by the law-enforcement agency or Department of State Police and a portion to be provided to the offender after fingerprints and a photograph have been taken.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 133, in subsection A, inserted “community-based” preceding “probation” in the introductory paragraph and in subdivision A 1; in subdivision A 5, inserted “and services” following “treatment programs” in two places; and inserted “local community-based” preceding “probation” in subdivisions A 6 and B 1.

The 2007 amendment by c. 528 added subdivision A 10 and made related changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 384 and 410 are identical, and effective March 23, 2011, substituted “marijuana, or synthetic cannabinoids” for “or, marijuana” in subdivision A 4.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 674 and 719 are identical, and deleted “or synthetic cannabinoids” following “marijuana” in subdivision A 4, and made stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 316 and 671 are identical, and added subdivision A 11; in subdivision B 4, substituted “and fines” for “fines and restitution to the victims of crime.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 782 and 783 are identical, and added subdivision A 12; and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 41 and 42 are identical, and in subdivision A 10, substituted “Department of Forensic Science DNA data bank sample tracking system” for “Local Inmate Data System,” “is stored in the DNA data bank” for “has been taken for DNA analysis,” “an offender’s sample is not stored in the data bank” for “no sample has been taken,” and “require the” for “require an.”

§ 9.1-177.
Form of oath of office for local community-based probation officers.

Every local community-based probation officer who is an employee of a local community-based probation agency, established by any city, county or combination thereof, or operated pursuant to this article, that provides probation and related services pursuant to the requirements of this article, shall take an oath of office as prescribed in §

49-1

before entering the duties of his office. The oath of office shall be taken before any general district or circuit court judge in any city or county that has established services for the judicial system pursuant to this article.

History.

2000, c. 1040, § 53.1-182.1:1; 2001, c. 844; 2007, c. 133.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 133 inserted “community-based” preceding “probation officer” near the beginning of the first sentence.

§ 9.1-177.1.
Confidentiality of records of and reports on adult persons under investigation by, or placed on probation supervision with a local community-based probation services agency.

Any investigation report, including a presentencing investigation report, prepared by a local community-based probation officer is confidential and is exempt from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.). Such reports shall be filed as a part of the case record. Such reports shall be made available only by court order and shall be sealed upon final order by the court; except that such reports shall be available upon request to (i) any criminal justice agency, as defined in §

9.1-101

, of this or any other state or of the United States; (ii) any agency where the accused is referred for assessment or treatment; (iii) counsel for the person who is the subject of the report; or (iv) counsel who represents the person in pursuit of a post-conviction remedy, subject to the limitations set forth in §

37.2-901

.

Any report on the progress of an offender under the supervision of a local community-based probation agency and any information relative to the identity of or inferring personal characteristics of an accused, including demographic information, diagnostic summaries, records of office visits, medical, substance abuse, psychiatric or psychological records or information, substance abuse screening, assessment and testing information, and other sensitive information not explicitly classified as criminal history record information, is exempt from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.). However, such information may be disseminated to criminal justice agencies as defined in §

9.1-101

in the discretion of the custodian of these records.

History.

2002, c. 769; 2003, c. 146; 2006, c. 289; 2007, c. 133; 2010, c. 223.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 146, in the last sentence of subsection A, deleted “sealed upon receipt by the court and” following “shall be,” and inserted “and shall be sealed upon final order by the court” following “court order.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 289 inserted “including a presentencing investigation report” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 133 substituted “services agency” for “program” in the section heading; and inserted “community-based” preceding “probation officer” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 223 added clause (iv) in subsection A and made a related change.

§ 9.1-178.
Community criminal justice boards.

Each county or city or combination thereof developing and establishing a local pretrial services or a community-based probation services agency pursuant to this article shall establish a community criminal justice board. Each county and city participating in local pretrial services or local community-based probation services shall be represented on the community criminal justice board. In the event that one county or city appropriates funds to these services as part of a multijurisdictional effort, any other participating county or city shall be considered to be participating if such locality appropriates funds to these services. Appointments to the board shall be made by each local governing body. In cases of multijurisdictional participation, unless otherwise agreed upon, each participating city or county shall have an equal number of appointments. Boards shall be composed of the number of members established by a resolution or ordinance of each participating jurisdiction.

Each board shall include, at a minimum, the following members: a person appointed by each governing body to represent the governing body; a judge of the general district court; a circuit court judge; a juvenile and domestic relations district court judge; a chief magistrate; one chief of police or the sheriff in a jurisdiction not served by a police department to represent law enforcement; an attorney for the Commonwealth; a public defender or an attorney who is experienced in the defense of criminal matters; a sheriff or the regional jail administrator responsible for jails serving those jurisdictions involved in local pretrial services and community-based probation services; a local educator; and a community services board administrator. Any officer of the court appointed to a community criminal justice board pursuant to this subsection may designate a member of his staff approved by the governing body to represent him at meetings of the board.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-128.19; 1980, c. 300; 1982, c. 636, § 53.1-183; 1983, c. 344; 1988, c. 557; 1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2; 1995, cc. 502, 574, 768; 1996, c. 342; 1997, c. 339; 2000, c. 1040; 2001, c. 593; 2001, c. 844; 2002, c. 491; 2004, c. 395; 2007, c. 133.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 491, effective April 5, 2002, substituted “local pretrial services or a community-based probation” for “community corrections” in the first and second sentences; substituted “composed of the number of members established by a resolution or ordinance of each participating jurisdiction” for “limited to fifteen members, except in cases of multijurisdictional boards which shall be limited to twenty members” in the sixth sentence; and in the final sentence, inserted “at a minimum,” inserted “members: a person appointed by each governing body to represent the governing body,” and substituted “local pretrial services and community-based probation” for “community-based corrections.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 395 divided the former provisions of the section into present subsections A and B; and added the last sentence in subsection B.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 133, in subsection A, substituted “community-based probation services agency” for “community-based probation program” in the first sentence, substituted “local community-based probation services” for “a community-based probation program” in the second sentence and in the third sentence, substituted “these services” for “the program” in two places and deleted “in a program” following “participating”; and in subsection B, in the first sentence, deleted “the” preceding “local pretrial services” and substituted “community-based probation services” for “community-based probation program.”

§ 9.1-179.
Withdrawal from services.

Any participating city or county may, at the beginning of any calendar quarter, by ordinance or resolution of its governing body, notify the Director of the Department and, in the case of multijurisdictional services, the other member jurisdictions, of its intention to withdraw from participation in local community-based probation services. Withdrawal shall be effective as of the last day of the quarter in which the notice is given.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-128.20; 1980, c. 300; 1982, c. 636, § 53.1-184; 1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2; 1995, cc. 502, 574; 2000, c. 1040; 2001, c. 844; 2002, c. 491; 2007, c. 133.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 491, effective April 5, 2002, inserted “and, in the case of multijurisdictional programs, the other member jurisdictions,” and substituted “local community-based probation” for “community corrections.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 133, in the first sentence, substituted “multijurisdictional services” for “multijurisdictional programs” and “participation in local community-based probation services” for “the local community-based probation program.”

§ 9.1-180.
Responsibilities of community criminal justice boards.

On behalf of the counties, cities, or combinations thereof which they represent, the community criminal justice boards shall have the responsibility to:

Advise on the development and operation of local pretrial services and community-based probation services pursuant to §§

19.2-152.2

and

9.1-176

for use by the courts in diverting offenders from local correctional facility placements;

Assist community agencies and organizations in establishing and modifying programs and services for defendants and offenders on the basis of an objective assessment of the community’s needs and resources;

Evaluate and monitor community programs and pretrial and local community-based probation services and facilities to determine their impact on offenders;

Develop and amend the criminal justice plan in accordance with guidelines and standards set forth by the Department and oversee the development and amendment of the community-based corrections plan as required by §

53.1-82.1

for approval by participating local governing bodies;

Review the submission of all criminal justice grants regardless of the source of funding;

Facilitate local involvement and flexibility in responding to the problem of crime in their communities; and

Do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the responsibilities expressly given in this article.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-128.21; 1980, c. 300; 1982, c. 636, § 53.1-185; 1983, c. 344; 1991, c. 43; 1992, c. 740; 1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2; 1995, cc. 502, 574; 2000, c. 1040; 2001, c. 844; 2002, c. 491; 2007, c. 133.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 491, effective April 5, 2002, in subdivision 1, substituted “Advise on the” for “Provide for the purchase,” and substituted “local pretrial services and community-based probation programs and services pursuant to §§

19.2-152.2

and

9.1-176

” for “community programs, and facilities”; in subdivision 4, substituted “criminal justice” for “community corrections,” inserted “and oversee the development and amendment of the community-based corrections plan as required by §

53.1-82.1

,” and deleted “and” at the end of the subdivision; added present subdivisions 5 and 6; and redesignated former subdivision 5 or present subdivision 7.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 133 deleted “programs and” following “community-based probation” in subdivision 1; inserted “defendants and” preceding “offenders” in subdivision 2; and in subdivision 3, inserted “and pretrial and local community-based probation” and made a related change.

§ 9.1-181.
Eligibility to participate.

Any city, county, or combination thereof, which elects to, or is required to establish services shall participate in a local community-based probation services agency by ordinance or resolution of its governing authority. In cases of multijurisdictional participation, each ordinance or resolution shall identify the chosen administrator and fiscal agent as set forth in §

9.1-183

. Such ordinances or resolutions shall be provided to the Director of the Department, regardless of funding source for the established programs.

Any local community-based probation services agency established pursuant to this article shall be available as a sentencing alternative for persons sentenced to incarceration in a local correctional facility or who otherwise would be sentenced to incarceration and who would have served their sentence in a local or regional correctional facility.

History.

1992, c. 196, § 53.1-185.1; 1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2; 2000, c. 1040; 2001, c. 844; 2007, c. 133.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 133 substituted “services” for “programs” in the first sentence of subsection A; and “community-based probation services agency” for “community-based probation program” in subsections A and B.

§ 9.1-182.
Funding; failure to comply; prohibited use of funds.

Counties and cities shall be required to establish a local community-based probation services agency under this article only to the extent funded by the Commonwealth through the general appropriation act.

The Department shall periodically review each program established under this article to determine compliance with the submitted plan and operating standards. If the Department determines that a program is not in substantial compliance with the submitted plan or standards, the Department may suspend all or any portion of financial aid made available to the locality for purposes of this article until there is compliance.

Funding shall be used for the provision of local community-based probation services and operation of facilities but shall not be used for capital expenditures.

The Department, in conjunction with local boards, shall establish a statewide system of supervision and intervention fees to be paid by offenders participating in local community-based probation services established under this article for reimbursement towards the costs of their supervision.

Any supervision or intervention fees collected by local community-based probation services agencies established under this article shall be retained by the locality serving as fiscal agent and shall be utilized solely for expansion and development of services, or to supplant local costs of operation. Any local community-based probation services agency collecting such fees shall keep records of the collected fees, report the amounts to the locality serving as fiscal agent and make all records available to the community criminal justice board. Such fees shall be in addition to any other imposed on a defendant or offender as a condition of a deferred proceeding, conviction or sentencing by a court as required by general law.

History.

1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2, § 53.1-185.2; 1995, cc. 502, 574, 768; 2000, c. 1040; 2001, c. 844; 2007, c. 133.

Cross references.

As to sentences involving community-based probation services, see §

19.2-303.3

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 133 substituted “services agency” for “program” in subsection A; in subsection C, inserted “local community-based probation” preceding ‘’services” and deleted “programs and” preceding “facilities”; substituted “local community-based probation services” for “programs” in subsection D; and in subsection E, in the first sentence, substituted “local community-based probation services agencies” for “local programs” and “expansion and development of services” for “program expansion and program development”
and deleted “the program” preceding “operation” and, in the second sentence, substituted “local community-based probation services agency” for “program.”

§ 9.1-183.
City or county to act as administrator and fiscal agent.

Any single participating city or county shall act as the administrator and fiscal agent for the funds awarded for purposes of implementing a local pretrial services or community-based probation services agency. In cases of multijurisdictional participation, the governing authorities of the participating localities shall select one of the participating cities or counties, with its consent, to act as administrator and fiscal agent for the funds awarded for purposes of implementing the local pretrial services or community-based probation services agency on behalf of the participating jurisdictions.

The participating city or county acting as administrator and fiscal agent pursuant to this section may be reimbursed for the actual costs associated with the implementation of the local pretrial services or community-based probation services agency, including fiscal administration, accounting, payroll services, financial reporting, and auditing. Any costs must be approved by the community criminal justice board and reimbursed from those funds received for the operation of the local pretrial or community-based probation services agency, and may not exceed one percent of those funds received in any single fiscal year.

History.

1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2, § 53.1-185.3; 1995, cc. 502, 574; 1996, c. 969; 2000, c. 1040; 2001, c. 844; 2007, c. 133.

Cross references.

As to eligibility to participate in a program governed by the Comprehensive Community Corrections Act for Local-Responsible Offenders, see §

9.1-181

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 133 substituted “community-based probation services agency” for “community-based probation program” in the first and last sentences of the first paragraph; and in the second sentence of the second paragraph, inserted “pretrial or.”